test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aigaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - aigā: # Noun 20 'eng /est äär/fin' - full paradigm
     aigā+N+Sg+Nom: aigā
     aigā+N+Sg+Gen: aigā
     aigā+N+Sg+Par: [aʼigõ, aigõ]
     aigā+N+Sg+Dat: aigān
     aigā+N+Sg+Ins: aigāks
     aigā+N+Sg+Ill: [aʼigõ, aigõ]
     aigā+N+Sg+Ela: aigāst
     aigā+N+Pl+Nom: aigād
     aigā+N+Pl+Gen: aigād
     aigā+N+Pl+Par: [aʼigḑi, aigḑi]
     aigā+N+Pl+Dat: aigādõn
     aigā+N+Pl+Ins: aigādõks
     aigā+N+Pl+Ill: [aʼigži, aigži]
     aigā+N+Pl+Ela: [aʼigšti, aigšti]
